Washington statutes.
RCW 39.58.210

Failure to furnish information—Failure to comply with chapter—Revocation of authority—Costs for noncompliance.

If a depositary neglects or refuses to promptly and accurately furnish, or to allow verification of, any required information requested by the commission or by the director of the department of financial institutions when acting on behalf of the commission pursuant to this chapter, or if a public depositary otherwise fails to comply with this chapter or any rules or policies of the commission, the commission may at its option deny or revoke the authority of such depositary to act as a public depositary pursuant to this chapter, or otherwise suspend such depositary from receiving or holding public deposits until such time as the depositary receives the information or complies with the commission's rules and policies. The commission shall have the authority to assess by rule costs for a depositary's noncompliance with this chapter and rules and resolutions adopted pursuant to this chapter.

[ 2009 c 9 s 15.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 9: See note following RCW 39.58.010.